Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202568-1207.02
Child welfare system; suicide awareness and prevention; curriculum and training materials.

For purposes of providing training for individuals involved in the child welfare system, the Department of Health and Human Services shall develop a baseline of curriculum and training materials related to suicide awareness and prevention in consultation with statewide and national organizations and professionals with expertise in behavioral and mental health and suicide prevention, including, but not limited to, the Nebraska State Suicide Prevention Coalition and the Behavioral Health Education Center of Nebraska. All such suicide awareness and prevention training shall incorporate evidence-based practices and may include, but not be limited to, (1) identification of early warning signs and symptoms of behavioral and mental health issues for youth in the child welfare system and (2) appropriate and effective responses for behavioral and mental health issues and trauma-informed care.

Laws 2025, LB217, § 1.